Utah statutes.
54-7-6.   Fees.
(1)  The commission shall charge and collect the following fees: for filing
applications for certificates of convenience and necessity, $100 each; for
copies of papers and records not required to be certified or otherwise
authenticated by the commission, 15 cents for each folio; for certified copies
of official documents and orders filed in its office, 20 cents for each folio,
and $2 for every certificate under seal affixed thereto; for certifying a copy
of any report made by a public utility, $2; for each certified copy of the
annual report of the commission, $3; for certified copies of evidence and
proceedings before the commission, 50 cents for each folio in the original
copy and 25 cents for each folio in the carbon copies.
(2)  Fees may not be charged or collected for copies of papers, records, or
official documents, except certified copies of evidence and proceedings
referred to in this chapter, furnished to public officers for use in their
official capacity, or for the annual reports of the commission in the ordinary
course of distributions.  However, the commission may fix reasonable charges
for publications issued under its authority.
(3)  All fees charged and collected under this section shall be paid into the
treasury of the state to the credit of the funds appropriated for the use of
the commission, but fees for certified copies of evidence and proceedings
before the commission which are reported by a shorthand reporter may be
collected and retained by the official shorthand reporter of the commission
pursuant to rules prescribed by the commission.
